vec_IT/vec_IT.aff
FLAG long
# trasformaŧion intra varianti (l > ƚ, j > ɉ, ŧ > s)
SFX Ṿe Y 51
SFX Ṿe lò ƚò [aeiou]lò
SFX Ṿe là ƚà [aeiou]là
SFX Ṿe lè ƚè [aeiou]lè
SFX Ṿe leto ƚeto/M0Ᵽd [aeiouàèéíòóú]leto
SFX Ṿe lèto ƚèto/M0 [aeiou]lèto
SFX Ṿe loto ƚoto/M0Ᵽd [aeiouàèéíòóú]loto
SFX Ṿe lòto ƚòto/M0 [aeiou]lòto
SFX Ṿe leta ƚeta/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]leta
SFX Ṿe lèta ƚèta/F0 [aeiou]lèta
SFX Ṿe lòta ƚòta/F0 [aeiou]lòta
SFX Ṿe lon ƚon/F0Ᵽd [aeiouàèéíòóú]lon
SFX Ṿe lona ƚona/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lona
SFX Ṿe l ƚo/M0Ᵽd [eo]l
SFX Ṿe l ƚo/M0 [aiuàèéíòóú]l
SFX Ṿe la ƚa/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]la
SFX Ṿe lio ƚio/M0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lio
SFX Ṿe lia ƚia/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lia
SFX Ṿe lan ƚan/M0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lan
SFX Ṿe lana ƚana/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lana
SFX Ṿe lin ƚin/M0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lin
SFX Ṿe lina ƚina/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lina
SFX Ṿe len ƚen/M0Ᵽd [aeiouàèéíòóú]len
SFX Ṿe lena ƚena/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lena
SFX Ṿe lèn ƚèn/M0Ᵽd [aeiouàèéíòóú]lèn
SFX Ṿe lèna ƚèna/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]lèna
SFX Ṿe jo ɉo/M0FS jo
SFX Ṿe ja ɉa/F0 ja
SFX Ṿe jon ɉon/F0ɃlⱣd jon
SFX Ṿe jona ɉona/F0 jona
SFX Ṿe ŧo so/M0FSⱣd [eo]ŧo
SFX Ṿe ŧo so/M0FS [^eo]ŧo
SFX Ṿe ŧa sa/F0 ŧa
SFX Ṿe ŧe se/M0 ŧe
SFX Ṿe ŧio sio/M0 ŧio
SFX Ṿe ŧia sia/F0 ŧia
SFX Ṿe ŧía sía/F0 ŧía
SFX Ṿe ŧon son/F0ɃlⱣd ŧon
SFX Ṿe ŧona sona/F0 ŧona
SFX Ṿe ŧion sion/F0ɃlⱣd ŧion
SFX Ṿe ŧal sal/F0Ƀl ŧal
SFX Ṿe ŧèl sèl/M0Ƀl ŧèl
SFX Ṿe ŧial sial/F0Ƀl ŧial
SFX Ṿe ŧin sin/M0 ŧin
SFX Ṿe ŧina sina/F0 ŧina
SFX Ṿe ŧen sen/M0 ŧen
SFX Ṿe ŧena sena/F0 ŧena
SFX Ṿe đo xo/M0Ᵽd [eo]đo
SFX Ṿe đo xo/M0 [^eo]đo
SFX Ṿe đa xa/F0 đa
SFX Ṿe đan xan/M0 đan
SFX Ṿe đana xana/F0 đana

# trasformaŧion intra varianti ko èle vanesente (j > ɉ)
SFX Ṿɇ Y 1
SFX Ṿɇ jo ɉo/M0 jo

# trasformaŧion intra varianti (femenil l > ƚe)
SFX Ṿē Y 1
SFX Ṿē l ƚe/F0 [aeiouàèéíòóú]l

# trasformaŧion iniŧial de paròla intra varianti (l > ƚ, ƚ > l, j > ɉ, ŧ > s, đ > x)
PFX Ṿè Y 12
PFX Ṿè j ɉ j
PFX Ṿè xj xɉ xj
PFX Ṿè l ƚ l
PFX Ṿè ƚ l ƚ
PFX Ṿè ŧ s ŧ
PFX Ṿè đ x đ
PFX Ṿè inđ inx inđ
PFX Ṿè J Ɉ J
PFX Ṿè L Ƚ L
PFX Ṿè Ƚ L Ƚ
PFX Ṿè Ŧ S Ŧ
PFX Ṿè Đ X Đ


### Pàdoa ###

# metafonèxi padoana
SFX Ᵽd Y 55
SFX Ᵽd el ili el
SFX Ᵽd ol uli ol
SFX Ᵽd en ini en
SFX Ᵽd on uni on
SFX Ᵽd er iri er
SFX Ᵽd or uri or
SFX Ᵽd exe ixi exe
SFX Ᵽd edo idi edo
SFX Ᵽd odo udi odo
SFX Ᵽd eđo iđi eđo
SFX Ᵽd ođo uđi ođo
SFX Ᵽd eko iki eko
SFX Ᵽd oko uki oko
SFX Ᵽd eƚo iƚi eƚo
SFX Ᵽd oƚo uƚi oƚo
SFX Ᵽd eño iñi eño
SFX Ᵽd oño iñi oño
SFX Ᵽd eso isi eso
SFX Ᵽd oso usi oso
SFX Ᵽd eto iti eto
SFX Ᵽd oto uti oto
SFX Ᵽd eŧo iŧi eŧo
SFX Ᵽd oŧo uŧi oŧo
SFX Ᵽd evo ivi evo
SFX Ᵽd ovo uvi ovo
SFX Ᵽd exo ixi exo
SFX Ᵽd oxo uxi oxo
SFX Ᵽd orse ursi orse
SFX Ᵽd ente inti ente
SFX Ᵽd onte unti onte
SFX Ᵽd oldo uldi oldo
SFX Ᵽd ordo urdi ordo
SFX Ᵽd orđo urđi orđo
SFX Ᵽd olko ulki olko
SFX Ᵽd orko urki orko
SFX Ᵽd ento inti ento
SFX Ᵽd onto unti onto
SFX Ᵽd orxo urxi orxo
SFX Ᵽd órden úrdini órden
SFX Ᵽd ojoxo ujuxi ojoxo
SFX Ᵽd oɉoxo uɉuxi oɉoxo
SFX Ᵽd oloxo uluxi oloxo
SFX Ᵽd oƚoxo uƚuxi oƚoxo
SFX Ᵽd omoxo umuxi omoxo
SFX Ᵽd oñoxo uñuxi oñoxo
SFX Ᵽd oroxo uruxi oroxo
SFX Ᵽd obioxo ubiuxi obioxo
SFX Ᵽd ofioxo ufiuxi ofioxo
SFX Ᵽd olioxo uliuxi olioxo
SFX Ᵽd oƚioxo uƚiuxi oƚioxo
SFX Ᵽd onioxo uniuxi onioxo
SFX Ᵽd orioxo uriuxi orioxo
SFX Ᵽd ostoxo ustuxi ostoxo
SFX Ᵽd ordioxo urdiuxi ordioxo
SFX Ᵽd obrioxo ubriuxi obrioxo


### Viŧenŧa ###

# kanbio viŧentin (re- > ra-, se- > sa-, per- > par-)
PFX Ṿŧ Y 24
PFX Ṿŧ be ba ber
PFX Ṿŧ bè bà bèr
PFX Ṿŧ bé bà bér
PFX Ṿŧ fe fa fer
PFX Ṿŧ fè fà fèr
PFX Ṿŧ fé fà fér
PFX Ṿŧ me ma mer
PFX Ṿŧ mè mà mèr
PFX Ṿŧ mé mà mér
PFX Ṿŧ pe pa per
PFX Ṿŧ pè pà pèr
PFX Ṿŧ pé pà pér
PFX Ṿŧ re ra re
PFX Ṿŧ rè rà rè
PFX Ṿŧ ré rà ré
PFX Ṿŧ se sa se
PFX Ṿŧ sè sà sè
PFX Ṿŧ sé sà sé
PFX Ṿŧ Se Sa Se
PFX Ṿŧ te ta te
PFX Ṿŧ tè tà tè
PFX Ṿŧ té tà té
PFX Ṿŧ ŧe ŧa ŧe
PFX Ṿŧ ve va ver


### Verona ###

# kanbio veronexe (-ente > -ènte/M0FS, -ento > -ènto/M0FSⱣd)
SFX Ṿr Y 3
SFX Ṿr ente ènte/M0FS ente
SFX Ṿr ento ènto/M0FS ento
SFX Ṿr enta ènta/F0 enta

# kanbio veronexe ko èle vanesente (-ente > -ènte/M0, -ento > -ènto/M0Ᵽd)
SFX Ṿɍ Y 3
SFX Ṿɍ ente ènte/M0 ente
SFX Ṿɍ ento ènto/M0 ento
SFX Ṿɍ enta ènta/F0 enta


# piante e mistièri (-(i)èr/-(i)er, -aro, -dor/-tor, -(i)ol/-(i)òl)
SFX V0 Y 72
SFX V0 èr er/M0Ᵽd èr
SFX V0 èr ar/M0 èr
SFX V0 èr ereto/M0FSⱣd èr
SFX V0 èr areto/M0FSⱣd èr
SFX V0 èra ara/F0 èra
SFX V0 èra era/F0 èra
SFX V0 èra ereta/F0 èra
SFX V0 èra areta/F0 èra
SFX V0 ièr er/M0Ᵽd ièr
SFX V0 ièr èr/M0 ièr
SFX V0 ièr ar/M0 ièr
SFX V0 ièr ereto/M0FSⱣd ièr
SFX V0 ièr areto/M0FSⱣd ièr
SFX V0 ièra ara/F0 ièra
SFX V0 ièra èra/F0 ièra
SFX V0 ièra era/F0 ièra
SFX V0 ièra ereta/F0 ièra
SFX V0 ièra areta/F0 ièra
SFX V0 èr ier/M0Ᵽd [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V0 èr ièr/M0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V0 èr iar/M0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V0 èr iereto/M0FSⱣd [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V0 èr iareto/M0FSⱣd [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V0 èra iara/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V0 èra ièra/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V0 èra iera/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V0 èra iereta/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V0 èra iareta/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V0 0 eto/M0FSⱣd [aei]dor
SFX V0 dor or/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V0 dor tor/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V0 dor oreto/M0FSⱣd [aei]dor
SFX V0 dor toreto/M0FSⱣd [aei]dor
SFX V0 a eta/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V0 dora ora/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V0 dora tora/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V0 dora oreta/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V0 dora toreta/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V0 r ora/F0 [^èo]r
SFX V0 r dora/F0 [^èo]r
SFX V0 r or/M0Ᵽd [^èo]r
SFX V0 r tora/F0 [^èo]r
SFX V0 r dor/M0Ᵽd [^èo]r
SFX V0 r oreta/F0 [^èo]r
SFX V0 r tor/M0Ᵽd [^èo]r
SFX V0 r doreta/F0 [^èo]r
SFX V0 r toreta/F0 [^èo]r
SFX V0 r oreto/M0FSⱣd [^èo]r
SFX V0 r doreto/M0FSⱣd [^èo]r
SFX V0 r toreto/M0FSⱣd [^èo]r
SFX V0 rò ora/F0 rò
SFX V0 rò dora/F0 rò
SFX V0 rò or/M0Ᵽd rò
SFX V0 rò tora/F0 rò
SFX V0 rò dor/M0Ᵽd rò
SFX V0 rò oreta/F0 rò
SFX V0 rò tor/M0Ᵽd rò
SFX V0 rò doreta/F0 rò
SFX V0 rò toreta/F0 rò
SFX V0 rò oreto/M0FSⱣd rò
SFX V0 rò doreto/M0FSⱣd rò
SFX V0 rò toreto/M0FSⱣd rò
SFX V0 ol òl/M0Ƀl [dđñrsŧx]ol
SFX V0 0 eto/M0FSⱣd [dđñrsŧx]ol
SFX V0 ol iol/M0ɃlⱣd [dđrsŧx]ol
SFX V0 ol ioleto/M0FSⱣd [dđrsŧx]ol
SFX V0 ol iòl/M0Ƀl [dđrsŧx]ol
SFX V0 ola òla/F0 [dđñrsŧx]ola
SFX V0 a eta/F0 [dđñrsŧx]ola
SFX V0 ola iola/F0 [dđrsŧx]ola
SFX V0 ola ioleta/F0 [dđrsŧx]ola
SFX V0 ola iòla/F0 [dđrsŧx]ola

# piante e mistièri ko èle vanesente (-èr, -aro, -(i)oƚo/-(i)òƚo)
SFX V1 Y 56
SFX V1 a eta/F0 [ñrsx]oƚa
SFX V1 o eto/M0Ᵽd [dñrsx]oƚo
SFX V1 0 eto/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V1 èr er/M0Ᵽd ièr
SFX V1 oƚa òƚa/F0 [ñrsx]oƚa
SFX V1 oƚa ioƚa/F0 [rsx]oƚa
SFX V1 oƚa iòƚa/F0 [rsx]oƚa
SFX V1 oƚa ioƚeta/F0 [rsx]oƚa
SFX V1 oƚo òƚo/M0 [dñrsx]oƚo
SFX V1 oƚo iòƚo/M0 [drsx]oƚo
SFX V1 oƚo ioƚo/M0Ᵽd [drsx]oƚo
SFX V1 oƚo ioƚeto/M0Ᵽd [drsx]oƚo
SFX V1 ièr ar/M0 ièr
SFX V1 ièr er/M0Ᵽd ièr
SFX V1 ièr areto/M0Ᵽd ièr
SFX V1 ièr ereto/M0Ᵽd ièr
SFX V1 dor or/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V1 dor tor/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V1 dor oreto/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V1 dor toreto/M0Ᵽd [aei]dor
SFX V1 r ora/F0 r
SFX V1 r dora/F0 r
SFX V1 r or/M0Ᵽd r
SFX V1 r tora/F0 r
SFX V1 r dor/M0Ᵽd r
SFX V1 r oreta/F0 r
SFX V1 r tor/M0Ᵽd r
SFX V1 r doreta/F0 r
SFX V1 r toreta/F0 r
SFX V1 r oreto/M0Ᵽd r
SFX V1 r doreto/M0Ᵽd r
SFX V1 r toreto/M0Ᵽd r
SFX V1 èr ar/M0 [^i]èr
SFX V1 èr ièr/M0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V1 èr ier/M0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V1 èr areto/M0Ᵽd [^i]èr
SFX V1 èr ereto/M0Ᵽd [^i]èr
SFX V1 èr iereto/M0Ᵽd [^aeoucijɉñ]èr
SFX V1 a eta/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V1 ièra ara/F0 ièra
SFX V1 ièra era/F0 ièra
SFX V1 ièra areta/F0 ièra
SFX V1 ièra ereta/F0 ièra
SFX V1 dora ora/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V1 dora tora/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V1 dora oreta/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V1 dora toreta/F0 [aei]dora
SFX V1 èra ara/F0 [^i]èra
SFX V1 èra era/F0 [^i]èra
SFX V1 èra iara/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V1 èra iera/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V1 èra ièra/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V1 èra areta/F0 [^i]èra
SFX V1 èra ereta/F0 [^i]èra
SFX V1 èra iareta/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra
SFX V1 èra iereta/F0 [^aeoucijɉñ]èra


# nominali deajetivali (-eŧa)
SFX ěS Y 11
SFX ěS 0 eŧa/F0 n
SFX ěS èl eleŧa/F0 èl
SFX ěS èr ereŧa/F0 èr
SFX ěS 0 ŧa/F0 [^d]e
SFX ěS o eŧa/F0 [^dks]o
SFX ěS 0 eŧa/F0 [^è][lr]
SFX ěS òde odeŧa/F0 òde
SFX ěS òdo odeŧa/F0 òdo
SFX ěS òko okeŧa/F0 òko
SFX ěS òso oseŧa/F0 òso
SFX ěS o eŧa/F0 [^ò][dks]o
