vec_IT/vec_IT.dic
ferméntoe/a0a1a2I1Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present is:interrogative st:fermentar
júbilo/a0a1P0P1FSI0Ṿè	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:jubilar
perkòto/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:perkòter al:prekotar
renkuro/a0a1a2P0P1P2FSI0Ṿŧ	po:verb ts:indicative_present st:renkurar
rascar/a0a1a2P0P1P2r0r5V0	po:verb ts:infinitive_simple
perintexo/A1FSⱣdṾŧ	po:verb ts:participle_perfect_strong st:perinténder
Joana/ṾèZ0	po:proper_noun is:singular_femenine
percò/Ṿŧ	po:adjective_interrogative
barkaroƚa/F0V1ǎᶊ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
fièr/M0ěSěs	po:noun is:singular_masculine
fondamenta/F0Ṿɍ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
kardenal/F0ɃlṾē	po:noun is:singular_masculine
lekapíe/Ṿè	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
longo/M0FSěSěs^6ětǒn	po:noun is:singular_masculine
muxelon/A2ɃlⱣd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
pasiente/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:adjective is:singular
poƚivaƚente/M0ⱣdṾɍ	po:adjective is:singular
responsàbil/F0Ṿē	po:adjective is:singular
roxèr/M0V0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
aspro/M0ěSěsět	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
barixèl/M0ɃlṾe	po:noun is:singular_masculine
borsaroƚa/F0V1*0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
desposente/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:adjective is:singular
fórfexe/M0FSⱣd	po:noun is:singular_femenine
insoƚente/M0ǒÑⱣdṾɍ	po:noun is:singular
kokal/F0ɃlṾēǒn	po:noun is:singular_masculine
koƚèjo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
koronèr/M0V0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
ƚuamèra/F0V1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
ƚuxèrtoƚa/F0Ṿè	po:noun is:singular_femenine
piaja/F0Ṿe	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
rebalta/F0ělěƚṾŧ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
riko/A1FSěSěs^6ǒN	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
seƚèr/M0V1	po:noun is:singular_masculine
skivoƚeso/M0Ᵽd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
stiŧarol/M0ɃlV0Ᵽd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
tajente/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:adjective is:singular
ruviɉòla/F0Ṿe	po:noun is:singular_femenine
asaƚente/M0ⱣdṾɍ	po:adjective is:singular
imòbel/F0ɃƚṾē	po:adjective is:singular
malenkoñoxo/A1FSⱣd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
preveƚèjo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
strimento/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:noun is:singular_masculine
uƚimento/M0ⱣdṾɍ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
uxurèr/M0V0	po:noun is:singular_masculine
revendaroƚo/M0V1Ᵽd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
jelada/F0Y0Ṿèǐn	po:noun is:singular_femenine
badial/F0ɃlṾē	po:adjective is:singular
kavièl/M0ɃlṾe	po:noun is:singular_masculine
leriɉoxo/A1FSⱣd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
ƚeròjo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
permaloxo/A1FSWaⱣdṾŧ	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
baiƚajo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
bardasiòla/F0Ṿe	po:noun is:singular_femenine
boɉo/M0FSěSěsǎSǎsět	po:noun is:singular_masculine
bokarol/M0ɃlV0Ᵽd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
boñígol/M0ɃƚⱣdṾe	po:noun is:singular_masculine
brigente/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:noun is:singular
đojelèra/F0V0Ṿè	po:noun is:singular_femenine
grave/M0ěSěs	po:noun is:singular_masculine
inservíbil/F0Ṿē	po:adjective is:singular
jus/Ṿè	po:noun is:masculine
maƚistente/Ṿɍ	po:adverb
pantaŧa/F0Ṿe	po:adjective is:singular_femenine
poƚejo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
ponteroƚo/M0V1Ᵽd	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
posidente/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:noun is:singular_masculine
prosedíbil/F0Ṿē	po:adjective is:singular
skritoreto/A1FSⱣd	po:noun is:singular_masculine
stranio/M0WaěSěsět	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
ŧixmatego/A1FSṾè	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
unguento/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:noun is:singular_masculine
xñèxola/F0Ṿe	po:interjection
ƚamento/M0ǐnǒñⱣdṾɍ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
meal/F0ɃlṾē	po:noun is:singular_masculine
portaƚeròjo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
pòrta–ƚaròjo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
pòrta–reƚòjo/M0Ṿɇ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
reɉéstola/F0ṾeṾŧ	po:noun is:singular_femenine
orbixiòla/F0Ṿe	po:noun is:singular_femenine
baulèra/F0V0	po:noun is:singular_femenine
luxente/M0FSⱣdṾr	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
ƚodamèra/F0V1	po:noun is:singular_femenine
ƚuxente/M0ⱣdṾɍ	po:noun is:singular_masculine
tóndol/M0ɃƚⱣdṾe	po:adjective is:singular_masculine
lanpadario/M0Ṿè	po:noun is:singular_masculine
